hu: Polarizáció: Cirkuláris; Elliptikus; Vízszintes; Cirkulárisan balra; Lineáris; Cirkulárisan jobbra; Vertikális; Egyéb
zh-TW: 偏振: 圓圈; 橢圓形; 水平; 左旋; 線性; 右旋; 垂直; 其他
de: Polarisation: Kreisförmig; Elliptisch; Horizontal; Kreisförmig linksdrehend; Linear; Kreisförmig rechtsdrehend; Vertikal; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Polarizacija: Kružna; Eliptična; Horizontalna; Lijevi cirkular; Linearna; Desni cirkular; Vertikalna; Ostalo
vi: Phân cực: Hình tròn; Máy tập liên hoàn Mỹ; Ngang; Hình tròn bên trái; Tuyến tính; Hình tròn bên phải; Dọc; Khác
pl: Polaryzacja: Tarczowe; Eliptyczny; Pozioma; Lewy okrągły; Liniowy; Prawy okrągły; Pionowa; Inne
en: Polarization: Circular; Elliptical; Horizontal; Left-hand circular; Linear; Right hand circular; Vertical; Other
zh-CN: 极化: 圆形; 椭圆形; 水平; 左旋圆; 线性; 右旋圆; 垂直; 其他
th: โพลาไรซ์: แบบวงกลม; ทรงรี; แนวนอน; โพลาไรเซชันแบบวนซ้าย; โพลาไรเซชันเชิงเส้น; โพลาไรเซชันแบบวนขวา; แนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
nl: Polarisatie: Rond; Elliptisch; Horizontaal; Linkse cirkel; Lineair; Rechtse cirkel; Verticaal; Andere
bg-BG: Поляризация: Кръгла; Елиптична; Хоризонтална; Лява кръгова; Линейна; Дясна кръгова; Вертикална; Други
lt-LT: Poliarizacija: Apvalus; Elipsės formos; Horizontalus; Kairysis apvalus; Linijinis; Dešinysis apvalus; Vertikalus; Kita
ro-RO: Polarizare: Circular; Eliptic; Orizontal; Circular stânga; Liniar; Circular dreapta; Vertical; Altele
nb: Polarisering: Sirkulær; Elliptisk; Horisontal; Venstre sirkulær; Lineær; Høyre sirkulær; Vertikal; Annet
pt-BR: Polarização: Circular; Elíptico; Horizontal; Circular à esquerda; Linear; Circular à direita; Vertical; Outro
ko: 편파: 원형; 타원형; 수평; 왼쪽 원형; 선형; 오른쪽 원형; 수직; 기타
es: Polarización: Circular; Elíptico; Horizontal; Circular izquierda; Lineal; Circular derecha; Vertical; Otros
cs: Polarizace: Kruhový; Eliptický; Horizontální; Levostranná kruhová; Lineární; Pravostranná kruhová; Vertikální; Jiné
sk-SK: Polarizácia: Kruhový; Eliptický; Horizontálny; Ľavý kruhový; Lineárny; Pravý kruhový; Vertikálny; Iné
pt-PT: Polarização: Circular; Elíptico; Horizontal; Circular à esquerda; Linear; Circular à direita; Vertical; Outro
ru: Поляризация: Круговая; Эллиптическая; Горизонтальная; Левая круговая; Линейная; Правая круговая; Вертикальная; Другая
sv: Polarisering: Cirkulär; Elliptisk; Horisontell; Vänster cirkulär; Linjär; Höger cirkulär; Vertikal; Övrigt
tr: Polarizasyon: Dairesel; Eliptik; Yatay; Sol el dairesel; Doğrusal; Sağ el dairesel; Dikey; Diğer
sl-SI: Polarizacija: Krožna; Eliptična; Vodoravna; Levo krožna; Linearna; Desno krožna; Navpična; Drugo
el: Πόλωση: Κυκλική; Ελλειπτική; Οριζόντιο; Αριστερά κυκλική; Γραμμικός; Δεξιά κυκλική; Κάθετο; Άλλο
it: Polarizzazione: Circolare; Ellittico; Orizzontale; Circolare sinistra; Lineare; Circolare destra; Verticale; Altro
da: Polarisering: Cirkulær; Elliptisk; Vandret; Venstre cirkulær; Lineær; Højre cirkulær; Lodret; Andet
fr: Polarisation: Circulaire; Elliptique; Horizontal; Circulaire à gauche; Linéaire; Circulaire à droite; Vertical; Autre
ja: 偏波: 円形; 楕円; ホリゾンタル; 左旋円; 線型; 右旋円; バーティカル; その他
fi: Polarisaatio: Pyöreä; Elliptinen; Vaakasuora; Vasemmalle pyörivä; Lineaarinen; Oikealle pyörivä; Pystysuora; Muu